Utah statutes.
63H-1-701.   Annual authority budget -- Fiscal year -- Public hearing
required -- Auditor forms -- Requirement to file form.
(1)  The authority shall prepare and its board adopt an annual budget of
revenues and expenditures for the authority for each fiscal year.
(2)  Each annual authority budget shall be adopted before June 22.
(3)  The authority's fiscal year shall be the period from July 1 to the
following June 30.
(4) (a)  Before adopting an annual budget, the authority board shall hold a
public hearing on the annual budget.
(b)  The authority shall provide notice of the public hearing on the annual
budget by:
(i)  publishing notice:
(A)  at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the authority
boundaries, one week before the public hearing; and
(B) on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701, for at
least one week immediately before the public hearing; or
(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the authority
boundaries as described in Subsection (4)(a)(i)(A), posting a notice of the
public hearing in at least three public places within the authority
boundaries.
(c)  The authority shall make the annual budget available for public
inspection at least three days before the date of the public hearing.
(5)  The state auditor shall prescribe the budget forms and the categories to
be contained in each authority budget, including:
(a)  revenues and expenditures for the budget year;
(b)  legal fees; and
(c)  administrative costs, including rent, supplies, and other materials, and
salaries of authority personnel.
(6) (a)  Within 30 days after adopting an annual budget, the authority board
shall file a copy of the annual budget with the auditor of the county in which
the authority is located, the State Tax Commission, the state auditor, the
State Board of Education, and each taxing entity that levies a tax on property
from which the authority collects tax increment.
(b)  The requirement of Subsection (6)(a) to file a copy of the annual budget
with the state as a taxing entity is met if the authority files a copy with
the State Tax Commission and the state auditor.
